Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-218
Trade name;
enforcement of rights.

Sections 87-208 to 87-219.01 shall not adversely affect rights
in trade names, or the enforcement of rights in trade names, acquired at any
time in good faith at common law.

Laws 1967, c. 628, § 11, p. 2104;

Laws 1997, LB 453, § 16;

Laws 2011, LB462, § 18.